Louisiana, session 2026, HB649.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2943 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2943. Rules and regulations
A. The Board of Regents, in consultation with the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education, shall adopt rules and regulations for the implementation
of this Chapter.
B.(1) The Board of Regents, in coordination with Louisiana public
postsecondary education institutions, shall establish and administer a uniform,
statewide application process for high school students to apply to participate in dual
enrollment programs.
(2) Each public postsecondary education institution shall participate in the
process established in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, unless an institution provides
written notice of non-participation to its management board.
(3) Each public postsecondary education management board, in coordination
with the Board of Regents, shall coordinate and adopt institutional implementation
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 649 ENROLLED
plans to improve student access, efficiency, and cost savings to include, at a
minimum, rules for notice of non-participation and re-entry into participation.
(4) Each public postsecondary education management board, in consultation
with the Board of Regents, shall adopt a standard uniform dual enrollment tuition rate
for all dual enrollment courses.
C. The Board of Regents, in consultation with the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education, shall manage the grants pursuant to R.S. 17:2944,
including but not limited to application requirements, evaluation criteria, evaluation
criteria and selection.
C. D. Nothing in this Chapter is intended to prohibit a city, parish, and other
local public school board from developing and continuing an interinstitutional
articulation and transfer agreement with a public postsecondary education institution
relative to dual enrollment.
Section 2. The provisions of R.S. 17:2943 as amended and reenacted by Section 1
of this Act shall be implemented no later than the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.